Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2509
Prospective petition, defined.

Prospective petition shall mean a sample document containing the information necessary for a completed petition, including a sample signature sheet, which has not yet been authorized for circulation.

Laws 1982, LB 807, § 9.